Massachusetts, session 194th, H326.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 81 of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of ''Fire protection sprinkler
system contractor'' the following definitions:
“Geothermal heat pump”, also referred to as “earth-coupled heat pump” or “ground-
source heat pump”, a heating and cooling system that utilizes ground temperatures to heat and
cool buildings.
“Hydrogen system”, a heating or cooling system and the components thereof consisting
of one or more of the following: hydrogen production, hydrogen transportation/storage,
hydrogen utilization.
Said Section 81 is further amended after the definition of ''Master refrigeration
technician'' the following definition:
of 2

"Microreactor”, a factory-fabricated, transportable, and self-adjusting device in which
nuclear fission initiates a controlled chain reaction, producing heat energy.
Said Section 81 is further amended by inserting after the word “processes” in the
definition of ''Pipefitting'', the following words:- “ geothermal heat pumps, hydrogen systems,
microreactors, small modular reactors”.
Said Section 81 is further amended by inserting after the definition of “Registered”, the
following definitions:-
“Residential/Light Commercial Refrigeration”, the installation, repair, replacement,
maintenance of any refrigerant containing part of any refrigerant system of less than ten ton
capacity.
“Small modular reactor”, an advanced nuclear reactor that has a power capacity of up to
300 MW(e) per unit.
SECTION 2. Said Chapter 146 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 82,
the following new section:-
Section 82A. The bureau shall adopt regulations for the examining and licensing of
refrigeration technicians working on residential or light commercial refrigeration systems of less
than ten tons. Licensing fees collected shall be placed in a retained revenue account to hire
qualified inspectors to enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2